Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.310.501

Civil liability—2013 c 197.

This act does not create any civil liability on the part of the state or any state agency, officer, employee, agent, political subdivision, or school district.

[ 2013 c 197 s 10.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2013 c 197: See note following RCW 43.20A.765.

Findings—Intent—2013 c 197: See note following RCW 28A.410.226.